Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 271 General Provisions Concerning Private Corporations [Repealed]

271.005.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

271.010.
Corporation — Who may establish — Laws applicable. [Repealed.]

271.015.
Application of chapter. [Repealed.]

271.020.
Articles of incorporation — Contents. [Repealed.]

271.025.
Who may form a corporation — Purposes of incorporation — Ownership of stock. [Repealed.]

271.030.
Articles of incorporation — Filing — Fees — Statement of existence — Constitute evidence. [Repealed.]

271.035.
Articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271.040.
Signers of articles to direct affairs until election of directors. [Repealed.]

271.045.
Corporate name. [Repealed.]

271.050.
Corporation to accept Constitution. [Repealed.]

271.055.
Filing and recording articles of incorporation — Issuing certificate of incorporation — Articles and statement of existence of foreign corporation — Copies of articles as evidence. [Repealed.]

271.060.
Corporation — When considered organized — Powers. [Repealed.]

271.065.
When corporate existence begins — Subscribers become shareholders. [Repealed.]

271.068.
Retroactive validation of corporate existence — Continuation. [Repealed.]

271.070.
Failure to begin business in two years forfeits powers. [Repealed.]

271.072.
Acceptance of constitutional provisions. [Repealed.]

271.075.
Subscriptions for shares before incorporation. [Repealed.]

271.080.
Limitations on business and holding of land — Escheat procedure. [Repealed.]

271.085.
Minimum amount of capital. [Repealed.]

271.090.
Place of business and agent for process to be in state — Statements filed — Fees. [Repealed.]

271.095.
Conditions precedent to beginning business — Liability in case of violation of section. [Repealed.]

271.100.
Want of legal organization no defense. [Repealed.]

271.105.
Validity and effect of certificate of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271.110.
Fifty percent of stock to be subscribed before business commenced — Collection of delinquent subscriptions. [Repealed.]

271.115.
Effect of filing or recording papers required to be filed. [Repealed.]

271.120.
Corporation not to hold its own capital stock — Exception. [Repealed.]

271.121.
Restatement of articles of incorporation as amended — Acknowledgement — Recording — Effect. [Repealed.]

271.125.
Corporate powers. [Repealed.]

271.130.
Increase or reduction of capital stock. [Repealed.]

271.135.
Acquisition of own shares. [Repealed.]

271.140.
Classes of stock. [Repealed.]

271.145.
Limitations on business and holding of real estate — Escheat procedure. [Repealed.]

271.147.
Facsimile signature and seal on debt securities. [Repealed.]

271.150.
Stock without par value. [Repealed.]

271.155.
Shares, classes and series of — Provisions for voting powers, special rights, restrictions, redemption, dividends, and priority on dissolution — Conversion or exchange — Provisions concerning division of classes into series. [Repealed.]

271.160.
Stock certificates — Issuance — Transfer of stock. [Repealed.]

271.165.
Stock certificates — Issuance, contents — Share warrants. [Repealed.]

271.170.
Corporation books. [Repealed.]

271.175.
Consideration for shares — Amount, payment. [Repealed.]

271.180.
Stockholders’ liability — Effect of transfer. [Repealed.]

271.185.
Payment for shares. [Repealed.]

271.190.
Enforcement of stockholders’ liability in certain companies. [Repealed.]

271.195.
Valuation of consideration for shares. [Repealed.]

271.200.
Fiduciary and pledgor may vote stock — Cumulative voting. [Repealed.]

271.205.
Validity of shares. [Repealed.]

271.210.
Officer or director issuing false statement — Liability for. [Repealed.]

271.215.
Liability of incorporators, subscribers, shareholders, directors and officers. [Repealed.]

271.220.
Directors of insolvent corporation declaring dividends — Liability for. [Repealed.]

271.225.
Transfer of shares. [Repealed.]

271.230.
Corporate directors — Qualifications — Quorum. [Repealed.]

271.235.
Corporation’s lien on shares. [Repealed.]

271.240.
Election of directors — Term — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

271.245.
Indemnification of officers and directors against liabilities, costs and expenses in connection with litigation in official capacity. [Repealed.]

271.250.
Consolidation of corporations — Agreement — Notice to stockholders — Consent. [Repealed.]

271.255.
Paid-in surplus. [Repealed.]

271.258.
Capital, earned surplus, paid-in surplus — Handling of surplus following merger. [Repealed.]

271.260.
Rights and duties taken over upon consolidation — Actions pending. [Repealed.]

271.265.
Dividends, authority to pay. [Repealed.]

271.270.
Stockholder objecting to consolidation to be paid for his stock. [Repealed.]

271.275.
Liability of directors and shareholders for dividends unlawfully paid or corporate assets otherwise unlawfully returned. [Repealed.]

271.280.
Change or amendment of articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271.285.
Bylaws. [Repealed.]

271.290.
Rights not impaired by sale or consolidation, or amendment of articles. [Repealed.]

271.295.
Shareholders’ meetings. [Repealed.]

271.300.
Dissolution of corporation — Withdrawal from state — Procedure. [Repealed.]

271.310.
Revocation of corporate powers — Causes for. [Repealed.]

271.315.
Voting rights. [Repealed.]

271.320.
Sale of corporate franchise and property. [Repealed.]

271.325.
Voting trusts. [Repealed.]

271.330.
Corporations may purchase assets of other corporations. [Repealed.]

271.335.
Quorum. [Repealed.]

271.340.
Organization of purchaser corporation. [Repealed.]

271.345.
Directors, election, meetings, powers — Action without meeting. [Repealed.]

271.350.
Sale of corporate property and franchise under court decree. [Repealed.]

271.355.
Officers and agents. [Repealed.]

271.360.
Receiver for corporation appointed upon insolvency or violation of law. [Repealed.]

271.365.
Relation of directors and officers to corporation. [Repealed.]

271.370.
Appointment of receiver upon request of creditor or stockholder. [Repealed.]

271.375.
Indemnification of directors, officers against loss due to action taken in official capacity. [Repealed.]

271.380.
Receiver — Powers — Duties — Jurisdiction of court. [Repealed.]

271.385.
Registered office and process agent. [Repealed.]

271.390.
Name to be on place of business — “Incorporated” to be on advertising. [Repealed.]

271.395.
Corporate books and records — Share register — Right of shareholders to inspect books. [Repealed.]

271.400.
Rights not to be exercised until required bond is executed. [Repealed.]

271.405.
Written consent of shareholders. [Repealed.]

271.410.
Charters and grants since 1856 may be repealed. [Repealed.]

271.415.
Voluntary transfer of corporate assets. [Repealed.]

271.420.
Right of burial association or corporation to condemn land for cemetery — Procedure. [Renumbered KRS 416.210.]

271.425.
Power to purchase assets of other corporation. [Repealed.]

271.430.
Board of incorporated cemetery to make annual report. [Renumbered as KRS 273.150.]

271.435.
Organization of purchaser corporation. [Repealed.]

271.440.
Sale of corporate assets under court decree. [Repealed.]

271.445.
Amendment of articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271.450.
Articles of amendment — Contents — Subscription — Recording. [Repealed.]

271.455.
Provisions relating to certain amendments. [Repealed.]

271.460.
Reduction of capital. [Repealed.]

271.461.
Limited application of KRS 271.445, 271.455, and 271.460. [Repealed.]

271.465.
Merger and consolidation authorized. [Repealed.]

271.468.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271.470.
Merger or consolidation, joint agreement for. [Repealed.]

271.475.
Consolidation, articles of incorporation for. [Repealed.]

271.480.
When merger or consolidation effective. [Repealed.]

271.485.
Effect of merger or consolidation. [Repealed.]

271.490.
Rights of dissenting shareholders on merger or consolidation — Inapplicable when — Abandonment of merger or consolidation. [Repealed.]

271.495.
Voluntary dissolution by incorporators. [Repealed.]

271.500.
Election to dissolve by act of the corporation or by consent of the shareholders. [Repealed.]

271.505.
Recording of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271.510.
Effect of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271.515.
Proceedings after recording of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271.520.
Method of revoking voluntary dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271.525.
Recording statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271.530.
Effect of statement of revocation of vountary dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271.535.
Articles of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271.540.
Filing articles of dissolution — Satisfaction of tax liabilities — Recording of articles, issuance of certificate of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271.545.
Recording fees in connection with dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271.550.
Venue of receivership suits — Parties. [Repealed.]

271.555.
Procedure in receivership suits. [Repealed.]

271.560.
Qualifications of receivers — Bond. [Repealed.]

271.565.
Filing of claims in receivership suits. [Repealed.]

271.570.
Decree of involuntary dissolution. [Repealed.]

271.575.
Filing and recording of decree of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271.580.
Disposition of distributive portions due shareholders who are unknown or cannot be found. [Repealed.]

271.585.
Survival of remedy after dissolution. [Repealed.]

271.590.
Revocation of corporate powers. [Repealed.]

271.595.
Requirements as to bond. [Repealed.]

271.600.
Charters and grants since 1856 may be repealed. [Repealed.]

271.605.
Secondary action by shareholders. [Repealed.]

271.610.
Service of process on foreign corporation after withdrawal from state, or in case of unauthorized doing of business in state. [Repealed.]

271.615.
Application of chapter to corporations in existence on June 30, 1946. [Repealed.]

271.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]